Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 48.1 Certification of Personnel Providing Educational Services to Very Young Children

16-48.1-1.
Definitions.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of elementary and secondary education or the designee of the commissioner.

“Person” when used to describe the owner or operator of a facility which must be licensed or registered with the commissioner includes individuals, associations, and corporations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 334, § 3.

16-48.1-2.
Qualification.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, any person seeking to operate or seeking employment in any facility covered under §

16-48-1

, if the employment involves supervisory or disciplinary power over a child or children or involves frequent and routine contact with a child or children without the presence of other employees, shall undergo an employment background check and criminal records check as provided for in this chapter. The commissioner may by rule identify those positions requiring background checks and criminal record checks.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 334, § 3.

16-48.1-3.
Employment background checks.

Any person seeking to operate a facility covered under §

16-48-1

will submit an affidavit to the commissioner providing information relating to individual employment history as shall be required by rule promulgated by the commissioner. Any person operating a facility covered under §

16-48-1

shall require all persons seeking employment, if the employment involves supervisory or disciplinary power over a child or children or involves routine contact with a child or children without the presence of other employees, to execute a similar affidavit prior to employment and will maintain the affidavit on file subject to inspection by the commissioner. Failure to require the affidavit or failure to maintain the affidavit on file will be prima facie grounds to revoke the authority of the facility to operate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 334, § 3.

16-48.1-4.
Criminal records checks — Operations.

Any person seeking to operate a facility covered under §

16-48-1

shall apply to the Rhode Island bureau of criminal identification for a nationwide criminal records check. The check will conform to the applicable federal standards including the taking of fingerprints to identify the applicant and any expense associated with providing the criminal record check shall be paid by the applicant and/or requesting agency. The commissioner will determine by rule those items of information appearing on a criminal records check which constitute disqualifying information because the information would indicate that the operation or, in the case of an employee, the employment could endanger the health or welfare of a child or children. Upon the discovery of any disqualifying information with respect to a proposed operator, the bureau of criminal identification will inform the commissioner in writing of the nature of the disqualifying information.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 334, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 247, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 240, § 1.

16-48.1-5.
Criminal records check — Employee.

Any person seeking employment, if the employment involves supervisory or disciplinary power over a child or children or involves routine contact with a child or children without the presence of other employees, in any facility covered under §

16-48-1

shall, after acceptance by the employer of the affidavit required by §

16-48.1-3

, apply to the Rhode Island bureau of criminal identification for a nationwide criminal records check. The check will conform to applicable federal standards including the taking of fingerprints to identify the applicant and any expenses associated with providing the criminal records check shall be paid by the applicant and/or requesting agency. Upon the discovery of any disqualifying information as defined in accordance with the rule promulgated by the commissioner, the Rhode Island bureau of criminal identification will inform the applicant, in writing, of the nature of the disqualifying information. In addition, the Rhode Island bureau of criminal identification will inform the employer, in writing, without disclosing the nature of the disqualifying information, that an item of disqualifying information has been discovered. In those situations in which no disqualifying information has been found, the Rhode Island bureau of criminal identification will inform both the applicant and the employer, in writing, of this fact. The employer will maintain on file, subject to inspection by the commissioner, evidence that the criminal records checks have been initiated on all employees seeking employment after August 1, 1985, and the results of the checks. Failure to maintain that evidence on file will be prima facie grounds to revoke the license or registration of the operator of the facility. It will be the responsibility of the Rhode Island bureau of criminal identification to conduct the nationwide criminal records check pursuant to this section. The nationwide criminal records check will be provided to the applicant for employment without charge to the applicant and without charge to the prospective employer if the employer is a tax exempt corporation or an unincorporated nonprofit organization qualified under § 501(c) of the United States Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c).

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 334, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 247, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 220, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 240, § 1.

16-48.1-6.
Prior criminal records checks.

If an applicant for employment has undergone a nationwide criminal records check pursuant to §

16-48.1-4

within eighteen (18) months of an application for employment, then an employer may request from the bureau of criminal identification of the state police or the local police department a letter indicating if any disqualifying information was discovered. The bureau of criminal identification will respond by stating if an item of disqualifying information was discovered without disclosing the nature of the disqualifying information. The letter may be maintained on file to satisfy the requirements of §

16-48.1-4

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 334, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 247, § 2.

16-48.1-7.
Rules and regulations.

The commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the intent of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 334, § 3.

16-48.1-8.
Destruction of fingerprint records.

At the conclusion of any background check required by this chapter, the state police or the local police department will promptly destroy the fingerprint card of the applicant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 66, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 247, § 2.